Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-273
Offstreet parking; rules and regulations; security for bonds.

Such city of the primary class is authorized to make all necessary rules and regulations governing the use, operation and control of such facilities. It shall establish and maintain equitable rates sufficient in amount to pay for the cost of the operation, repair and upkeep of the facilities to be purchased, acquired, or leased, and the principal of and interest on any revenue bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 15-269 to 15-276. The city may also make any other agreements with the purchasers of the bonds for the security of the issuing city and the purchasers of such bonds not in contravention of the provisions of sections 15-269 to 15-276.

Laws 1967, c. 51, § 5, p. 187.